pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Jogos em interior > Matraquilhos > Acessórios e peças para mesa de matraquilhos: Rolamentos e casquilhos para mesas de matraquilhos; Amortecedores para mesas de matraquilhos; Capas para mesas de matraquilhos; Pegas para mesa de matraquilhos; Bonecos para mesa de matraquilhos; Barras para mesa de matraquilhos
nb: Sportsutstyr > Innendørsspill > Foosball > Deler og tilbehør til foosballbord: Lagre og bøssinger for foosballbord; Dempere for foosballbord; Trekk for foosballbord; Håndtak til bordfotball; Spillere til bordfotball; Stenger til bordfotball
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Igre u zatvorenom > Stolni nogomet > Dijelovi i dodaci za stolove za stolni nogomet: Ležajevi i čahure za stol za stolni nogomet; Branici za stol za stolni nogomet; Navlake za stol za stolni nogomet; Ručke za stol za stolni nogomet; Igrači za stolni nogomet; Štapovi za stolni nogomet
ja: スポーツ用品 > 室内競技・室内ゲーム > フーズボール > テーブルサッカー台パーツ: フーズボールテーブル用ベアリング・ブッシュ; フーズボールテーブル用バンパー; フーズボールテーブルカバー; テーブルサッカー台ハンドル; テーブルサッカー台プレーヤー; テーブルサッカー台ロッド
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Игри на закрито > Футбол на маса > Части и аксесоари за футболни маси: Лагери и втулки за маса за джаги; Гумени стопери за маси за джаги; Покривала за маси за джаги; Дръжки за маса за футбол; Играчи за футболна маса; Пръчки за футболна маса
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > เกมในร่ม > ฟุสบอล > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์โต๊ะฟุตบอล: ตลับลูกปืนและบูชโต๊ะฟุตบอลมือหมุน; ยางกันกระแทกโต๊ะฟุตบอลมือหมุน; ผ้าคลุมโต๊ะฟุตบอลมือหมุน; ด้ามจับโต๊ะฟุตบอล; ตัวผู้เล่นฟุตบอลโต๊ะ; ไม้ฟุตบอลโต๊ะ
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Sisäpelit > Pöytäfutis > Pöytäfutispöytien osat ja tarvikkeet: Pöytäjalkapallopöytien laakerit ja holkit; Pöytäjalkapallopöytien joustimet; Pöytäjalkapallopöytien suojukset; Pöytäfutispöytien kahvat; Pöytäfutispöytien pelaajat; Pöytäfutispöytien tangot
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > İç Mekan Sporları > Langırt > Langırt Masası Parçaları ve Aksesuarları: Langırt masası rulmanları ve burçları; Langırt masası tamponları; Langırt masası kılıfları; Langırt Masası Kolları; Langırt Masası Oyuncuları; Futbol Masası Çubukları
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Gry towarzyskie > Piłkarzyki > Części stołów do gry w piłkarzyki: Łożyska i tuleje do stołów do piłkarzyków; Odbijaki do stołów do piłkarzyków; Pokrowce na stoły do piłkarzyków; Uchwyty do stołu do gry w piłkarzyki; Figurki do stołu do gry w piłkarzyki; Drążki do stołu do gry w piłkarzyki
sv: Sportartiklar > Inomhussporter > Bordsfotboll > Delar till bordsfotbollsbord: Lager och bussningar för foosballbord; Stötdämpare för foosballbord; Överdrag för foosballbord; Bordshandtag för bordsfotboll; Bordsfotbollsspelare; Fotbollsbordsstänger
nl: Sportartikelen > Binnenspelletjes > Tafelvoetbal > Onderdelen voor voetbaltafels: Tafelvoetballagers en -bussen; Tafelvoetbalbumpers; Tafelvoetbaltafelhoezen; Handgrepen voor voetbaltafels; Spelers voor tafelvoetbal; Stangen voor tafelvoetbal
ko: 스포츠용품 > 실내용 게임 > 푸스볼 > 푸스볼 테이블 부품/부대용품: 푸스볼 테이블 베어링 및 부싱; 푸스볼 테이블 범퍼; 푸스볼 테이블 커버; 푸스볼 테이블 핸들; 푸스볼 테이블 플레이어; 푸스볼 테이블 막대
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Jogos internos > Pebolim > Peças de mesa de pebolim: Rolamentos e buchas para mesa de pebolim; Amortecedores para mesa de pebolim; Capas para mesa de pebolim; Alças de mesa de pebolim; Bonecos para pebolim; Hastes de mesa de pebolim
de: Sportartikel > Indoor - Aktivitäten > Tischfußball > Zubehör für Tischfußballtische: Kickertisch-Lager & -Buchsen; Kickertisch-Puffer; Kickertisch-Abdeckungen; Tischfußballgriffe; Tischfußballspieler; Tischfußballstangen
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室內運動 > 手足球 > 手足球零件/配件: 手足球桌培林與軸套; 手足球桌緩衝墊; 手足球桌罩; 手足球桌手把; 桌上足球人偶; 桌上足球操作桿
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Interiérové hry > Stolný futbal > Časti a príslušenstvo stola na stolný futbal: Ložiská a puzdrá pre stolný futbal; Odrazové valce na stolný futbal; Poťahy na stolný futbal; Rúčky stola na stolný futbal; Tyče na stolný futbal; Hráči na stolný futbal
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Jocuri de interior > Fusbal > Piese și accesorii pentru mese de fusbal: Rulmenți și bucșe pentru masa de fotbal de masă; Amortizoare pentru mese de fotbal de masă; Huse pentru mese de fotbal de masă; Mânere pentru mese de fusbal; Jucători pentru masă de fotbal de masă; Tije pentru masă de fotbal de masă
ru: Спортивные товары > Игры в помещении > Настольный футбол > Детали и аксессуары для столов для настольного футбола: Подшипники и втулки для столов для кикера; Амортизаторы для столов для кикера; Чехлы для столов для кикера; Рукоятки для штанг для настольного футбола; Фигурки игроков для настольного футбола; Штанги для настольного футбола
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Indoorové aktivity > Stolní fotbal > Díly stolů na stolní fotbal: Ložiska a pouzdra pro stolní fotbálky; Dorazy pro stolní fotbálky; Kryty na stolní fotbálky; Stoly na stolní fotbal – rukojeti; Hráči pro stolní fotbal; Tyče pro stolní fotbal
hu: Sportszerek > Beltéri játékok > Csocsó > Csocsóasztal-alkatrészek és -kiegészítők: Csocsóasztal-csapágyak és perselyek; Csocsóasztal-ütközők; Csocsóasztal-takaróponyvák; Csocsóasztal-fogantyúk; Csocsófigurák; Csocsóasztal-rudak
it: Articoli sportivi > Giochi indoor > Biliardino > Accessori e componenti per tavolo da biliardino: Cuscinetti e boccole per biliardini; Gommini per biliardini; Coperture per biliardini; Maniglie del tavolo da biliardino; Giocatori per biliardino; Aste per biliardino
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 室内游戏 > 桌上足球 > 桌上足球零件/配件: 桌上足球桌轴承与轴套; 桌上足球桌减震垫; 桌上足球桌罩; 桌上足球把手; 桌上足球人偶; 桌上足球杆
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Kambario žaidimai > Stalo futbolas > Stalo futbolas stalų dalys ir priedai: Stalo futbolo guoliai ir įvorės; Stalo futbolo stalo buferiai; Stalo futbolo stalo uždangalai; Stalo futbolas stalų rankenos; Stalo futbolo stalų žaidėjai; Stalo futbolo stalų strypai
en: Sporting Goods > Indoor Games > Foosball > Foosball Table Parts & Accessories: Foosball Table Bearings & Bushings; Foosball Table Bumpers; Foosball Table Covers; Foosball Table Handles; Foosball Table Players; Foosball Table Rods
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Igre v zaprtih prostorih > Namizni nogomet > Deli in dodatki za mize za namizni nogomet: Ležaji in puše za namizni nogomet; Odbijači za namizni nogomet; Pokrivala za namizni nogomet; Ročaji za mizo za namizni nogomet; Figurice za namizni nogomet; Palice za namizni nogomet
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Các môn thi đấu trong nhà > Bi lắc > Phụ kiện bàn bi lắc: Vòng bi & bạc đạn bàn bi lắc; Đệm giảm chấn bàn bi lắc; Vỏ bọc bàn bi lắc; Tay cầm bàn bi lắc; Cầu thủ trên bàn bi lắc; Thanh cầm bàn bi lắc
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Juegos de interior > Futbolín > Piezas y accesorios para mesas de futbolín: Cojinetes y bujes para mesas de futbolín; Amortiguadores para mesas de futbolín; Fundas para mesas de futbolín; Asas para futbolín; Jugadores de futbolín; Varillas para mesa de futbolín
da: Sportsartikler > Indendørsspil > Bordfodbold > Bordfodboldborde – dele: Lejer og bøsninger til bordfodboldborde; Støddæmpere til bordfodboldborde; Overtræk til bordfodboldborde; Bordfodboldborde – håndtag; Spillere til bordfodboldborde; Stænger til bordfodboldborde
fr: Équipements sportifs > Jeux d’intérieur > Baby-foot > Pièces et accessoires pour tables de baby-foot: Paliers et bagues pour baby-foot; Butées de baby-foot; Housses pour baby-foot; Poignées de baby-foot; Joueurs de baby-foot; Tiges de baby-foot
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Παιχνίδια εσωτερικού χώρου > Ποδοσφαιράκι > Εξαρτήματα και αξεσουάρ τραπεζιού για ποδοσφαιράκι: Ρουλεμάν και δακτύλιοι τραπεζιών ποδοσφαιρακιών; Αμορτισέρ τραπεζιών ποδοσφαιρακιών; Καλύμματα τραπεζιών ποδοσφαιρακιών; Λαβές τραπεζιού για ποδοσφαιράκι; Ποδοσφαιριστές επιτραπέζιου ποδοσφαίρου; Ράβδοι επιτραπέζιου ποδοσφαίρου